Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-201.01
Attorney General; salary.

Until January 4, 2007, the annual salary of the Attorney General shall be seventy-five thousand dollars. Commencing January 4, 2007, the annual salary of the Attorney General shall be ninety-five thousand dollars. The salary of the Attorney General shall be payable in equal monthly installments.

Laws 1963, c. 538, § 1, p. 1684;

Laws 1965, c. 567, § 1, p. 1853;

Laws 1969, c. 833, § 1, p. 3156;

Laws 1973, LB 246, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 541, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 43, § 4;

Laws 1990, LB 503, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 956, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 817, § 3.